Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.300

Secretary or secretary's designee ex officio member of health professional licensure and disciplinary boards.

In order to provide liaison with the department of health, provide continuity between changes in board membership, achieve uniformity as appropriate in licensure or regulated activities under the jurisdiction of the department, and to better represent the public interest, the secretary, or a designee appointed by the secretary, shall serve as an ex officio member of every health professional licensure or disciplinary board established under Title 18 RCW under the administrative authority of the department of health. The secretary shall have no vote unless otherwise authorized by law.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 318; 1983 c 168 s 11. Formerly RCW 43.24.015.]